California statutes. Civil Code
 that call attention to the language. The first page of the link shall describe a customer’s rights pursuant to this section and shall provide the designated mailing address, e-mail address, as required, or toll-free telephone number or facsimile number, as appropriate. If the business elects to add the words “Your California Privacy Rights” to the home page’s link to the business’s privacy policy in a manner that complies with this subdivision, and the first page of the link describes a customer’s rights pursuant to this section, and provides the designated mailing address, electronic mailing address, as required, or toll-free telephone or facsimile number, as appropriate, the business need not respond to requests that are not received at one of the designated addresses or numbers.

(C) Make the designated addresses or numbers, or means to obtain the designated addresses or numbers, readily available upon request of a customer at every place of
 business in California where the business or its agents regularly have contact with customers.

The response to a request pursuant to this section received at one of the designated addresses or numbers shall be provided within 30 days. Requests received by the business at other than one of the designated addresses or numbers shall be provided within a reasonable period, in light of the circumstances related to how the request was received, but not to exceed 150 days from the date received.

(2) A business that is required to comply with this section and Section 6803 of Title 15 of the United States Code may comply with this section by providing the customer the disclosure required by Section 6803 of Title 15 of the United States Code, but only if the disclosure also complies with this section.

(3) A business that is required to comply with
 this section is not obligated to provide information associated with specific individuals and may provide the information required by this section in standardized format.

(c) (1) A business that is required to comply with this section is not obligated to do so in response to a request from a customer more than once during the course of any calendar year. A business with fewer than 20 full-time or part-time employees is exempt from the requirements of this section.

(2) If a business that is required to comply with this section adopts and discloses to the public, in its privacy policy, a policy of not disclosing personal information of customers to third parties for the third parties’ direct marketing purposes unless the customer first affirmatively agrees to that disclosure, or of not disclosing the personal information of customers to third parties for the
 third parties’ direct marketing purposes if the customer has exercised an option that prevents that information from being disclosed to third parties for those purposes, as long as the business maintains and discloses the policies, the business may comply with subdivision (a) by notifying the customer of his or her right to prevent disclosure of personal information, and providing the customer with a cost-free means to exercise that right.

(d) The following are among the disclosures not deemed to be disclosures of personal information by a business for a third party’s direct marketing purposes for purposes of this section:

(1) Disclosures between a business and a third party pursuant to contracts or arrangements pertaining to any of the following:

(A) The processing, storage, management, or organization of personal
 information, or the performance of services on behalf of the business during which personal information is disclosed, if the third party that processes, stores, manages, or organizes the personal information does not use the information for a third party’s direct marketing purposes and does not disclose the information to additional third parties for their direct marketing purposes.

(B) Marketing products or services to customers with whom the business has an established business relationship where, as a part of the marketing, the business does not disclose personal information to third parties for the third parties’ direct marketing purposes.

(C) Maintaining or servicing accounts, including credit accounts and disclosures pertaining to the denial of applications for credit or the status of applications for credit and processing bills or insurance claims for payment.

(D) Public record information relating to the right, title, or interest in real property or information relating to property characteristics, as defined in Section 408.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, obtained from a governmental agency or entity or from a multiple listing service, as defined in Section 1087, and not provided directly by the customer to a business in the course of an established business relationship.

(E) Jointly offering a product or service pursuant to a written agreement with the third party that receives the personal information, provided that all of the following requirements are met:

(i) The product or service offered is a product or service of, and is provided by, at least one of the businesses that is a party to the written agreement.

(ii) The product or service is jointly offered, endorsed, or sponsored by, and clearly and conspicuously identifies for the customer, the businesses that disclose and receive the disclosed personal information.

(iii) The written agreement provides that the third party that receives the personal information is required to maintain the confidentiality of the information and is prohibited from disclosing or using the information other than to carry out the joint offering or servicing of a product or service that is the subject of the written agreement.

(2) Disclosures to or from a consumer reporting agency of a customer’s payment history or other information pertaining to transactions or experiences between the business and a customer if that information is to be reported in, or used to generate, a consumer report as defined
 in subdivision (d) of Section 1681a of Title 15 of the United States Code, and use of that information is limited by the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(3) Disclosures of personal information by a business to a third party financial institution solely for the purpose of the business obtaining payment for a transaction in which the customer paid the business for goods or services with a check, credit card, charge card, or debit card, if the customer seeks the information required by subdivision (a) from the business obtaining payment, whether or not the business obtaining payment knows or reasonably should know that the third party financial institution has used the personal information for its direct marketing purposes.

(4) Disclosures of personal information between a licensed agent and its principal, if the personal information disclosed is
 necessary to complete, effectuate, administer, or enforce transactions between the principal and the agent, whether or not the licensed agent or principal also uses the personal information for direct marketing purposes, if that personal information is used by each of them solely to market products and services directly to customers with whom both have established business relationships as a result of the principal and agent relationship.

(5) Disclosures of personal information between a financial institution and a business that has a private label credit card, affinity card, retail installment contract, or cobranded card program with the financial institution, if the personal information disclosed is necessary for the financial institution to maintain or service accounts on behalf of the business with which it has a private label credit card, affinity card, retail installment contract, or cobranded card program, or to complete, effectuate,
 administer, or enforce customer transactions or transactions between the institution and the business, whether or not the institution or the business also uses the personal information for direct marketing purposes, if that personal information is used solely to market products and services directly to customers with whom both the business and the financial institution have established business relationships as a result of the private label credit card, affinity card, retail installment contract, or cobranded card program.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Customer” means an individual who is a resident of California who provides personal information to a business during the creation of, or throughout the duration of, an established business relationship if the business relationship is primarily for personal, family, or
 household purposes.

(2) “Direct marketing purposes” means the use of personal information to solicit or induce a purchase, rental, lease, or exchange of products, goods, property, or services directly to individuals by means of the mail, telephone, or electronic mail for their personal, family, or household purposes. The sale, rental, exchange, or lease of personal information for consideration to businesses is a direct marketing purpose of the business that sells, rents, exchanges, or obtains consideration for the personal information. “Direct marketing purposes” does not include the use of personal information (A) by bona fide tax exempt charitable or religious organizations to solicit charitable contributions, (B) to raise funds from and communicate with individuals regarding politics and government, (C) by a third party when the third party receives personal information solely as a consequence of having obtained for consideration permanent
 ownership of accounts that might contain personal information, or (D) by a third party when the third party receives personal information solely as a consequence of a single transaction where, as a part of the transaction, personal information had to be disclosed in order to effectuate the transaction.

(3) “Disclose” means to disclose, release, transfer, disseminate, or otherwise communicate orally, in writing, or by electronic or any other means to any third party.

(4) “Employees who regularly have contact with customers” means employees whose contact with customers is not incidental to their primary employment duties, and whose duties do not predominantly involve ensuring the safety or health of the business’s customers. It includes, but is not limited to, employees whose primary employment duties are as cashier, clerk, customer service, sales, or promotion. It does not, by way
 of example, include employees whose primary employment duties consist of food or beverage preparation or service, maintenance and repair of the business’s facilities or equipment, direct involvement in the operation of a motor vehicle, aircraft, watercraft, amusement ride, heavy machinery or similar equipment, security, or participation in a theatrical, literary, musical, artistic, or athletic performance or contest.

(5) “Established business relationship” means a relationship formed by a voluntary, two-way communication between a business and a customer, with or without an exchange of consideration, for the purpose of purchasing, renting, or leasing real or personal property, or any interest therein, or obtaining a product or service from the business, if the relationship is ongoing and has not been expressly terminated by the business or the customer, or if the relationship is not ongoing, but is solely established by the purchase, rental, or
 lease of real or personal property from a business, or the purchase of a product or service, and no more than 18 months have elapsed from the date of the purchase, rental, or lease.

(6) (A) The categories of personal information required to be disclosed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) are all of the following:

(i) Name and address.

(ii) Electronic mail address.

(iii) Age or date of birth.

(iv) Names of children.

(v) Electronic mail or other addresses of children.

(vi) Number of children.

(vii) The age or gender of children.

(viii) Height.

(ix) Weight.

(x) Race.

(xi) Religion.

(xii) Occupation.

(xiii) Telephone number.

(xiv) Education.

(xv) Political party affiliation.

(xvi) Medical condition.

(xvii) Drugs, therapies, or medical products or equipment used.

(xviii) The kind of product the customer purchased, leased, or rented.

(xix) Real property purchased, leased, or rented.

(xx) The kind of service provided.

(xxi) Social security number.

(xxii) Bank account number.

(xxiii) Credit card number.

(xxiv) Debit card number.

(xxv) Bank or investment account, debit card, or credit card balance.

(xxvi) Payment history.

(xxvii) Information pertaining to the customer’s creditworthiness, assets, income, or liabilities.

(B) If a list, description, or grouping of customer names or addresses is derived using any of these categories, and is disclosed to a third party for direct marketing purposes in a manner that permits the third party to identify, determine, or extrapolate any other personal information from which the list was derived, and that personal information when it was disclosed identified, described, or was associated with an individual, the categories set forth in this subdivision that correspond to the personal information used to derive the list, description, or grouping shall be considered personal information for purposes of this section.

(7) “Personal information” as used in this section means any information that when it was disclosed identified, described, or was able to be
 associated with an individual and includes all of the following:

(A) An individual’s name and address.

(B) Electronic mail address.

(C) Age or date of birth.

(D) Names of children.

(E) Electronic mail or other addresses of children.

(F) Number of children.

(G) The age or gender of children.

(H) Height.

(I) Weight.

(J) Race.

(K) Religion.

(L) Occupation.

(M) Telephone number.

(N) Education.

(O) Political party affiliation.

(P) Medical condition.

(Q) Drugs, therapies, or medical products or equipment used.

(R) The kind of product the customer purchased, leased, or rented.

(S) Real property purchased, leased, or rented.

(T) The kind of service provided.

(U) Social security number.

(V) Bank account number.

(W) Credit card number.

(X) Debit card number.

(Y) Bank or investment account, debit card, or credit card balance.

(Z) Payment history.

(AA) Information pertaining to creditworthiness, assets, income, or liabilities.

(8) “Third party” or “third parties” means one or more of the following:

(A) A business that is a separate legal entity from the business that has an established business
 relationship with a customer.

(B) A business that has access to a database that is shared among businesses, if the business is authorized to use the database for direct marketing purposes, unless the use of the database is exempt from being considered a disclosure for direct marketing purposes pursuant to subdivision (d).

(C) A business not affiliated by a common ownership or common corporate control with the business required to comply with subdivision (a).

(f) (1) Disclosures of personal information for direct marketing purposes between affiliated third parties that share the same brand name are exempt from the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) unless the personal information disclosed corresponds to one of the following categories, in which case the customer shall be informed
 of those categories listed in this subdivision that correspond to the categories of personal information disclosed for direct marketing purposes and the third party recipients of personal information disclosed for direct marketing purposes pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a):

(A) Number of children.

(B) The age or gender of children.

(C) Electronic mail or other addresses of children.

(D) Height.

(E) Weight.

(F) Race.

(G) Religion.

(H) Telephone number.

(I) Medical condition.

(J) Drugs, therapies, or medical products or equipment used.

(K) Social security number.

(L) Bank account number.

(M) Credit card number.

(N) Debit card number.

(O) Bank or investment account, debit card, or credit card balance.

(2) If a list, description, or grouping of customer names or addresses is derived using any of these categories, and is disclosed to a third party or third parties sharing the same brand name for direct marketing purposes in a manner that permits the
 third party to identify, determine, or extrapolate the personal information from which the list was derived, and that personal information when it was disclosed identified, described, or was associated with an individual, any other personal information that corresponds to the categories set forth in this subdivision used to derive the list, description, or grouping shall be considered personal information for purposes of this section.

(3) If a business discloses personal information for direct marketing purposes to affiliated third parties that share the same brand name, the business that discloses personal information for direct marketing purposes between affiliated third parties that share the same brand name may comply with the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) by providing the overall number of affiliated companies that share the same brand name.

(g) The
 provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(h) This section does not apply to a financial institution that is subject to the California Financial Information Privacy Act (Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 4050) of the Financial Code) if the financial institution is in compliance with Sections 4052, 4052.5, 4053, 4053.5, and 4054.6 of the Financial Code, as those sections read when they were chaptered on August 28, 2003, and as subsequently amended by the Legislature or by initiative.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.83.5.

(a) The purpose of this section is to ensure that information obtained on an Internet Web site regarding an individual’s age will not be used in furtherance of employment or age discrimination.

(b) A commercial online entertainment employment service provider that enters into a contractual agreement to provide employment services to an individual for a subscription payment shall not, upon request
 by the subscriber, do either of the following:

(1) Publish or make public the subscriber’s date of birth or age information in an online profile of the subscriber.

(2) Share the subscriber’s date of birth or age information with any Internet Web sites for the purpose of publication.

(c) A commercial online entertainment employment service provider subject to subdivision (b) shall, within five days, remove from public view in an online profile of the subscriber the subscriber’s date of birth and age information on any companion Internet Web sites under its control upon specific request by the subscriber naming the Internet Web sites. A commercial online entertainment employment service provider that permits members of the public to upload or modify Internet content on its own Internet Web site or any Internet Web site
 under its control without prior review by that provider shall not be deemed in violation of this section unless first requested by the subscriber to remove age information. 

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Commercial online entertainment employment service provider” means a person or business that owns, licenses, or otherwise possesses computerized information, including, but not limited to, age and date of birth information, about individuals employed in the entertainment industry, including television, films, and video games, and that makes the information available to the public or potential employers.

(2) “Payment” means a fee in exchange for advertisements, or any other form of compensation or benefit.

(3) “Provide employment services” means post resumes, photographs, or other information about a subscriber when one of the purposes is to provide individually identifiable information about the subscriber to a prospective employer. 

(4) “Subscriber” means a natural person who enters into a contractual agreement with a commercial online entertainment employment service provider to receive employment services in return for a subscription payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 555, Sec. 1.   (AB 1687)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.84.

(a) Any waiver of a provision of this title is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(b) Any customer injured by a violation of this title may institute a civil action to recover damages.

(c) In addition, for a willful, intentional, or reckless violation
 of Section 1798.83, a customer may recover a civil penalty not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) per violation; otherwise, the customer may recover a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) per violation for a violation of Section 1798.83.

(d) Unless the violation is willful, intentional, or reckless, a business that is alleged to have not provided all the information required by subdivision (a) of Section 1798.83, to have provided inaccurate information, failed to provide any of the information required by subdivision (a) of Section 1798.83, or failed to provide information in the time period required by subdivision (b) of Section 1798.83, may assert as a complete defense in any action in law or equity that it thereafter provided regarding the information that was alleged to be untimely, all the information, or accurate information, to all customers who were provided incomplete or inaccurate information, respectively, within
 90 days of the date the business knew that it had failed to provide the information, timely information, all the information, or the accurate information, respectively.

(e) Any business that violates, proposes to violate, or has violated this title may be enjoined.

(f) (1) A cause of action shall not lie against a business for disposing of abandoned records containing personal information by shredding, erasing, or otherwise modifying the personal information in the records to make it unreadable or undecipherable through any means.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that when records containing personal information are abandoned by a business, they often end up in the possession of a storage company or commercial landlord. It is the intent of the Legislature in paragraph (1) to create a safe
 harbor for such a record custodian who properly disposes of the records in accordance with paragraph (1).

(g) A prevailing plaintiff in any action commenced under Section 1798.83 shall also be entitled to recover his or her reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(h) The rights and remedies available under this section are cumulative to each other and to any other rights and remedies available under law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 134, Sec. 3.   (AB 1094)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.84.1.

(a) No person, business, or association shall solicit, sell, or trade on the internet the home address or telephone number of an elected or appointed official with the intent to cause imminent great bodily harm to the official or to any person residing at the official’s home address.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, an official whose home address or telephone number is solicited, sold, or traded in violation of subdivision (a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) If a jury or court finds that a violation has occurred, it shall award damages to that official in an amount up to a maximum of three times the actual damages but in no case less than four
 thousand dollars ($4,000).

(d) “Elected or appointed official” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 7920.500 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 200, Sec. 4.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.1. CONFIDENTIALITY OF SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBERS [1798.85. - 1798.89.]

1798.85.

(a) Except as provided in this section, a person or entity may not do any of the following:

(1) Publicly post or publicly display in any manner an individual’s social security number. “Publicly post” or “publicly display” means to intentionally communicate or otherwise make available to the general public.

(2) Print an individual’s social security number on any card required for the individual to access products or services provided by the person or entity.

(3) Require an individual to transmit the individual’s social security number over the internet, unless
 the connection is secure or the social security number is encrypted.

(4) Require an individual to use the individual’s social security number to access an internet website, unless a password or unique personal identification number or other authentication device is also required to access the internet website.

(5) Print an individual’s social security number on any materials that are mailed to the individual, unless state or federal law requires the social security number to be on the document to be mailed. Notwithstanding this paragraph, social security numbers may be included in applications and forms sent by mail, including documents sent as part of an application or enrollment process, or to establish, amend, or terminate an account, contract, or policy, or to confirm the
 accuracy of the social security number. A social security number that is permitted to be mailed under this section may not be printed, in whole or in part, on a postcard or other mailer not requiring an envelope, or visible on the envelope or without the envelope having been opened.

(6) Sell, advertise for sale, or offer to sell an individual’s social security number. For purposes of this paragraph, the following apply:

(A) “Sell” shall not include the release of an individual’s social security number if the release of the social security number is incidental to a larger transaction and is necessary to identify the individual in order to accomplish a legitimate business purpose. Release of an individual’s social security number for marketing purposes is not permitted.

(B) “Sell” shall not include the release of an individual’s social security number for a purpose specifically authorized or specifically allowed by federal or state law.

(b) This section does not prevent the collection, use, or release of a social security number as required by state or federal law or the use of a social security number for internal verification or administrative purposes.

(c) This section does not prevent an adult state correctional facility, an adult city jail, or an adult county jail from releasing an inmate’s social security number, with the inmate’s consent and upon request by the county veterans service officer or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, for the purposes of determining the
 inmate’s status as a military veteran and the inmate’s eligibility for federal, state, or local veterans’ benefits or services.

(d) This section does not apply to documents that are recorded or required to be open to the public pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220) of Division 7 of Title 1 of, Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of, Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of, or Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of, the Government Code. This section does not apply to records that are required by statute, case law, or California Rules of Court, to be made available to the public by entities provided for in Article VI of the California Constitution.

(e) (1) In the case of a health care service plan, a provider of health care, an insurer or a pharmacy benefits manager, a contractor as defined in Section 56.05, or the provision by any person or entity of administrative or other services relative to health care or insurance products or services, including third-party administration or administrative services only, this section shall become operative in the following manner:

(A) On or before January 1, 2003, the entities listed in paragraph (1) shall comply with paragraphs (1), (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (a) as these requirements pertain to individual policyholders or individual contractholders.

(B) On or before January 1, 2004, the entities
 listed in paragraph (1) shall comply with paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) as these requirements pertain to new individual policyholders or new individual contractholders and new groups, including new groups administered or issued on or after January 1, 2004.

(C) On or before July 1, 2004, the entities listed in paragraph (1) shall comply with paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) for all individual policyholders and individual contractholders, for all groups, and for all enrollees of the Healthy Families and Medi-Cal programs, except that for individual policyholders, individual contractholders and groups in existence prior to January 1, 2004, the entities listed in paragraph (1) shall comply upon the renewal date of the policy, contract, or group on or after July 1, 2004, but no later than July 1,
 2005.

(2) A health care service plan, a provider of health care, an insurer or a pharmacy benefits manager, a contractor, or another person or entity as described in paragraph (1) shall make reasonable efforts to cooperate, through systems testing and other means, to ensure that the requirements of this article are implemented on or before the dates specified in this section.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care, pursuant to the authority granted under Section 1346 of the Health and Safety Code, or the Insurance Commissioner, pursuant to the authority granted under Section 12921 of the Insurance Code, and upon a determination of good cause, may grant extensions not to exceed six months for compliance by health care service
 plans and insurers with the requirements of this section when requested by the health care service plan or insurer. Any extension granted shall apply to the health care service plan or insurer’s affected providers, pharmacy benefits manager, and contractors.

(f) If a federal law takes effect requiring the United States Department of Health and Human Services to establish a national unique patient health identifier program, a provider of health care, a health care service plan, a licensed health care professional, or a contractor, as those terms are defined in Section 56.05, that complies with the federal law shall be deemed in compliance with this section.

(g) A person or entity may not encode or embed a social security number in or on a card or document, including, but not
 limited to, using a barcode, chip, magnetic strip, or other technology, in place of removing the social security number, as required by this section.

(h) This section shall become operative, with respect to the University of California, in the following manner:

(1) On or before January 1, 2004, the University of California shall comply with paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a).

(2) On or before January 1, 2005, the University of California shall comply with paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a).

(i) This section shall become operative with respect to the Franchise Tax Board on January 1, 2007.

(j) This section shall become operative with respect to the California community college districts on January 1, 2007.

(k) This section shall become operative with respect to the California State University system on July 1, 2005.

(l) This section shall become operative, with respect to the California Student Aid Commission and its auxiliary organization, in the following manner:

(1) On or before January 1, 2004, the commission and its auxiliary organization shall comply with paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a).

(2) On or before January 1, 2005, the commission and its auxiliary organization shall comply with paragraphs (4) and (5) of
 subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 49.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.86.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.89.

(a) Unless otherwise required to do so by state or federal law, no person, entity, or governmental agency shall present for recording or filing with a county recorder a document that is required by any provision of law to be open to the public if that record displays more than the last four digits of a social security number. Unless otherwise authorized by state or federal law, a document containing more
 than the last four digits of a social security number is not entitled for recording.

(b) A recorder shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this section if he or she uses due diligence to truncate social security numbers in documents recorded, as provided in Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 27300) of Chapter 6 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(c) This section shall not apply to documents created prior to January 1, 2010.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 552, Sec. 2.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.15. Reader Privacy Act [1798.90. - 1798.90.05.]

1798.90.

(a) This title shall be known and may be cited as the Reader Privacy Act.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Book” means paginated or similarly organized content in printed, audio, electronic, or other format, including fiction, nonfiction, academic, or other works of the type normally published in a volume or finite number of
 volumes, excluding serial publications such as a magazine or newspaper.

(2) “Book service” means a service that, as its primary purpose, provides the rental, purchase, borrowing, browsing, or viewing of books. “Book service” does not include a store that sells a variety of consumer products when the book service sales do not exceed 2 percent of the store’s total annual gross sales of consumer products sold in the United States.

(3) “Government entity” means any state or local agency, including, but not limited to, a law enforcement entity or any other investigative entity, agency, department, division, bureau, board, or commission, or any individual acting or purporting to act for or on behalf of a state or local agency.

(4) “Law enforcement entity” means a district attorney, a district attorney’s office, a municipal
 police department, a sheriff’s department, a county probation department, a county social services agency, the Department of Justice, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation Division of Juvenile Facilities, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the police department of a campus of a community college, the University of California, or the California State University, or any other department or agency of the state authorized to investigate or prosecute the commission of a crime.

(5) “Personal information” means all of the following:

(A) Any information that identifies, relates to, describes, or is associated with a particular user, including, but not limited to, the information specifically listed in Section 1798.80.

(B) A unique identifier or
 Internet Protocol address, when that identifier or address is used to identify, relate to, describe, or be associated with a particular user or book, in whole or in partial form.

(C) Any information that relates to, or is capable of being associated with, a particular user’s access to or use of a book service or a book, in whole or in partial form.

(6) “Provider” means any commercial entity offering a book service to the public.

(7) “User” means any person or entity that uses a book service.

(c) A provider shall not knowingly disclose to any government entity, or be compelled to disclose to any person, private entity, or government entity, any personal information of a user, except under any of the following circumstances:

(1) A provider shall disclose personal information of a user to a law enforcement entity only pursuant to a court order issued by a duly authorized court with jurisdiction over an offense that is under investigation and only if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The court issuing the order finds that probable cause exists to believe the personal information requested is relevant evidence to the investigation of an offense and any of the grounds in Section 1524 of the Penal Code is satisfied.

(B) The court issuing the order finds that the law enforcement entity seeking disclosure has a compelling interest in obtaining the personal information sought.

(C) The court issuing the order finds that the personal information sought cannot be obtained by
 the law enforcement entity seeking disclosure through less intrusive means.

(D) Prior to issuance of the court order, the law enforcement entity seeking disclosure provides, in a timely manner, the provider with reasonable notice of the proceeding to allow the provider the opportunity to appear and contest issuance of the order.

(E) The law enforcement entity seeking disclosure has informed the provider that it has given notice of the court order to the user contemporaneously with the execution of the order, unless there is a judicial determination of a strong showing of necessity to delay that notification for a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 90 days.

(2) (A) A provider shall disclose personal information of a user to any of the following only if all of the conditions listed in
 subparagraph (B) are satisfied:

(i) A government entity, other than a law enforcement entity, pursuant to a court order issued by a court having jurisdiction over an offense under investigation by that government entity.

(ii) A government entity, other than a law enforcement entity, or a person or private entity pursuant to a court order in a pending action brought by the government entity or by the person or private entity.

 (B) A provider shall disclose personal information of a user pursuant to subparagraph (A) only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(i) The court issuing the order finds that the person or entity seeking disclosure has a compelling interest in obtaining the personal information sought.

(ii) The court issuing the order finds that the personal information sought cannot be obtained by the person or entity seeking disclosure through less intrusive means.

(iii) Prior to issuance of the court order, the person or entity seeking disclosure provides, in a timely manner, the provider with reasonable notice of the proceeding to allow the provider the opportunity to appear and contest the issuance of the court order.
